Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Assisted-Living Communities
194A.715.
Duty of assisted-living community to provide copy of KRS 194A.700 to 194A.729 and relevant administrative regulations to interested persons.

An assisted-living community shall provide any interested person with a copy of KRS 194A.700 to 194A.729 and relevant administrative regulations.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 141, § 8, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 165, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 24, § 11, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 36, § 8, effective July 15, 2010.

194A.715.
Duty of assisted-living community to provide copy of KRS 194A.700 to 194A.729 and relevant administrative regulations to interested persons.

An assisted living community shall provide any interested person with a copy of KRS 194A.700 to 194A.729 and relevant administrative regulations.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 141, § 8, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 165, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 24, § 11, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 36, § 8, effective July 15, 2010; 2022 ch. 20, § 8.

194A.717.
Staffing requirements — Prohibition against employing staff member with active communicable disease.

Staffing in an assisted-living community shall be sufficient in number and qualification to meet the twenty-four (24) hour scheduled needs of each client pursuant to the lease agreement and functional needs assessment.

One (1) awake staff member shall be on site at all times.

An assisted-living community shall have a designated manager who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age, has at least a high school diploma or a High School Equivalency Diploma, and has demonstrated management or administrative ability to maintain the daily operations.

No employee who has an active communicable disease reportable to the Department for Public Health shall be permitted to work in an assisted-living community if the employee is a danger to the clients or other employees.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 141, § 9, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 36, § 9, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 63, § 24, effective June 29, 2017.

194A.717.
Staffing requirements — Prohibition against employing staff member with active communicable disease.

Staffing in an assisted living community shall be sufficient in number and qualification to meet the twenty-four (24) hour scheduled needs of each resident pursuant to the lease agreement, functional needs assessment, and service plan.

One (1) awake staff member shall be on site at each licensed entity at all times.

An assisted living community shall have a designated manager who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age, has at least a high school diploma or a High School Equivalency Diploma, and has demonstrated management or administrative ability to maintain the daily operations.

No employee who has an active communicable disease reportable to the Department for Public Health shall be permitted to work in an assisted living community if the employee is a danger to the residents or other employees.

When a resident requires hands-on assistance of another person to walk, transfer, or move from place to place with or without an assistive device, the assisted living community shall have a policy that describes how priority will be given by staff sufficient to assist that resident during times of emergency when evacuation may be necessary.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 141, § 9, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 36, § 9, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 63, § 24, effective June 29, 2017; 2022 ch. 20, § 9.

194A.719.
In-service education for staff and management.

Assisted-living community staff and management shall receive orientation education on the following topics as applicable to the employee’s assigned duties:

Client rights;

Community policies;

Adult first aid;

Cardiopulmonary resuscitation unless the policies of the assisted-living community state that this procedure is not initiated by its staff, and that clients and prospective clients are informed of the policies;

Adult abuse and neglect;

Alzheimer’s disease and other types of dementia;

Emergency procedures;

Aging process;

Assistance with activities of daily living and instrumental activities of daily living;

Particular needs or conditions if the assisted-living community markets itself as providing special programming, staffing, or training on behalf of clients with particular needs or conditions; and

Assistance with self-administration of medication.

Assisted-living community staff and management shall receive annual in-service education applicable to their assigned duties that addresses no fewer than four (4) of the topics listed in subsection (1) of this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 141, § 10, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 36, § 10, effective July 15, 2010.

194A.719.
In-service education for staff and management.

Prior to independently working with residents, assisted living community staff and management shall receive orientation education addressing the following topics, with emphasis on those most applicable to the employee’s assigned duties:

Resident rights;

Community policies;

Adult first aid;

Cardiopulmonary resuscitation unless the policies of the assisted living community state that this procedure is not initiated by its staff, and that residents and prospective residents are informed of the policies;

Adult abuse and neglect;

Alzheimer’s disease and other types of dementia;

Emergency procedures;

Aging process;

Assistance with activities of daily living and instrumental activities of daily living;

Particular needs or conditions if the assisted living community markets itself as providing special programming, staffing, or training on behalf of residents with particular needs or conditions; and

Assistance with self-administration of medication.

Assisted living community staff and management shall receive annual in-service education applicable to their assigned duties that addresses no fewer than four (4) of the topics listed in subsection (1) of this section, one (1) of which shall be Alzheimer’s disease and other types of dementia.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 141, § 10, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 36, § 10, effective July 15, 2010; 2022 ch. 20, § 10.

194A.721.
Exemptions from space and bathing facilities requirements for living units of certain assisted-living communities.

Any assisted-living community that was open or under construction on or before July 14, 2000, shall be exempt from the requirement that each living unit have a bathtub or shower.

Any assisted-living community that was open or under construction on or before July 14, 2000, shall have a minimum of one (1) bathtub or shower for each five (5) clients.

Any assisted-living community that was open or under construction on or before July 14, 2000, shall be exempt from the requirement that each living unit shall be at least two hundred (200) square feet for single occupancy, or for double occupancy if the room is shared with a spouse or another individual by mutual agreement.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 141, § 11, effective July 14, 2000.

194A.721.
Exemptions from space and bathing facilities requirements for living units of certain assisted-living communities.

Any assisted living community that was open or under construction on or before July 14, 2000, shall be exempt from the requirement that each living unit have a bathtub or shower.

Any assisted living community that was open or under construction on or before July 14, 2000, shall have a minimum of one (1) bathtub or shower for each five (5) residents.

Any assisted living community that was open or under construction on or before July 14, 2000, shall be exempt from the requirement that each living unit shall be at least two hundred (200) square feet for single occupancy, or for double occupancy if the room is shared with a spouse or another individual by mutual agreement.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 141, § 11, effective July 14, 2000; 2022 ch. 20, § 11.

194A.723.
Penalties for operating without certification.

Any business that operates or markets its services as an assisted-living community without filing a current application with the department or receiving certification by the department may be fined up to five hundred dollars ($500) per day.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 141, § 12, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 166, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 24, § 12, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 36, § 11, effective July 15, 2010.

194A.723.
Penalties for operating without certification. [Repealed]

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 141, § 12, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 166, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 24, § 12, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 36, § 11, effective July 15, 2010; repealed by 2022 ch. 20, § 42.

194A.724.
Statements of danger — Penalty for receipt.

An assisted-living community that is issued more than two (2) statements of danger on separate dates within a six (6) month period that are not withdrawn by the department may be fined up to five hundred dollars ($500).

History.
Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 36, § 12, effective July 15, 2010.

194A.724.
Statements of danger — Penalty for receipt. [Repealed]

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 36, § 12, effective July 15, 2010; repealed by 2022 ch. 20, § 42.

194A.725.
Religious orders exempt from KRS 194A.700 to 194A.729.

Religious orders providing assistance with activities of daily living, instrumental activities of daily living, and self-administration of medication to vowed members residing in the order’s retirement housing shall not be required to comply with the provisions of KRS 194A.700 to 194A.729.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 141, § 13, effective July 14, 2000.

194A.727.
Ineligibility for certification of businesses not in full compliance with KRS 194A.700 to 194A.729.

Any business, not licensed or certified in another capacity, that complies with some provisions of KRS 194A.700 to 194A.729 but does not provide assistance with any activities of daily living or assistance with self-administration of medication shall not be eligible for certification as an assisted-living community under KRS 194A.700 to 194A.729.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 141, § 14, effective July 14, 2000.

194A.727.
Ineligibility for certification of businesses not in full compliance with KRS 194A.700 to 194A.729.

Any business, not licensed or certified in another capacity, that complies with some provisions of KRS 194A.700 to 194A.729 but does not provide assisted living services shall not be eligible for licensure as an assisted living community under KRS 194A.700 to 194A.729.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 141, § 14, effective July 14, 2000; 2022 ch. 20, § 12.

194A.729.
Department to provide information to lending institutions relative to financing for assisted-living community projects — Fee.

If a person or business seeks financing for an assisted-living community project, the department shall provide written correspondence to the lender, upon request, to denote whether the architectural drawings and lease agreement conditionally comply with the provisions of KRS 194A.700 to 194A.729. The department may promulgate administrative regulations to establish a fee that shall not exceed costs of the program to the cabinet, to be charged for the written correspondence to the lender.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 141, § 15, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 167, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 24, § 13, effective June 26, 2007; 2018 ch. 136, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

194A.729.
Department to provide information to lending institutions relative to financing for assisted-living community projects — Fee.

If a person or business seeks financing for an assisted living community project, the cabinet shall provide written correspondence to the lender, upon request, to denote whether the architectural drawings and lease agreement conditionally comply with the provisions of KRS 194A.700 to 194A.729. The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations to establish a fee that shall not exceed costs of the program to the cabinet, to be charged for the written correspondence to the lender.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 141, § 15, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 167, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 24, § 13, effective June 26, 2007; 2018 ch. 136, § 3, effective July 1, 2019; 2022 ch. 20, § 13.